Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1602
Repealed. Laws 2015, LB317, § 2. Operative date July 1, 2018. Participation by State of Nebraska; when authorized.

The State of Nebraska shall not participate in any rail project or appropriate funds for any rail project proposed by the Midwest Interstate Passenger Rail Compact unless the specific project is authorized by the enactment of a legislative bill. For purposes of this section, rail project includes the planning phase of such a project.

Laws 2001, LB 245, § 3.

Midwest Interstate Passenger Rail Compact, see section 74-1601.